Utah statutes.
53A-6-502.    Mandatory reporting of physical or sexual abuse of students.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "educator" means, in addition to a person
included under Section 53A-6-103, a person, including a volunteer or temporary
employee, who at the time of an alleged offense was performing a function in a
private school for which a license would be required in a public school.
(2)  In addition to any duty to report suspected cases of child abuse or
neglect under Section 62A-4a-403, an educator who has reasonable cause to
believe that a student may have been physically or sexually abused by a school
employee shall immediately report the belief and all other relevant
information to the school principal, superintendent, or to the office.
(3)  A school administrator who has received a report under Subsection (2) or
who otherwise has reasonable cause to believe that a student may have been
physically or sexually abused by an educator shall immediately report that
information to the office.
(4)  Failure to comply with Subsection (2) or (3) shall be considered
unprofessional conduct.
(5)  A person who makes a report under this section in good faith shall be
immune from civil or criminal liability that might otherwise arise by reason
of that report.
